en: Compatible cleat system: Crankbrothers; Crankbrothers Candy; Crankbrothers Eggbeater; Flat / no cleat; Look Delta; Look Keo; Look X-Track; SPD (2-bolt); SPD-SL; SPD-SL (3-bolt); Speedplay; Speedplay (4-hole); Time ATAC; Universal; Wahoo Speedplay; Other
zh-TW: 相容卡踏扣片系統: Crankbrothers; Crankbrothers Candy; Crankbrothers Eggbeater; 平踏 / 無卡踏扣片; Look Delta; Look Keo; Look X-Track; SPD (2 孔); SPD-SL; SPD-SL (3 孔); Speedplay; Speedplay (4 孔); Time ATAC; 通用; Wahoo Speedplay; 其他
da: Kompatibelt klampesystem: Crankbrothers; Crankbrothers Candy; Crankbrothers Eggbeater; Flad / ingen klampe; Look Delta; Look Keo; Look X-Track; SPD (2-bolt); SPD-SL; SPD-SL (3-bolt); Speedplay; Speedplay (4 huller); Time ATAC; Universal; Wahoo Speedplay; Andet
bg-BG: Съвместима система на зацепката: Crankbrothers; Crankbrothers Candy; Crankbrothers Eggbeater; Плосък / без парче; Look Delta; Look Keo; Look X-Track; SPD (с 2 болта); SPD-SL; SPD-SL (с 3 болта); Speedplay; Speedplay (с 4 отвора); Time ATAC; Универсална; Wahoo Speedplay; Друго
hr-HR: Kompatibilan sustav krampona: Crankbrothers; Crankbrothers Candy; Crankbrothers Eggbeater; Ravne / bez pločica; Look Delta; Look Keo; Look X-Track; SPD (2 vijka); SPD-SL; SPD-SL (3 vijka); Speedplay; Speedplay (4 rupe); Time ATAC; Univerzalno; Wahoo Speedplay; Ostalo
ro-RO: Sistem de crampoane compatibil: Crankbrothers; Crankbrothers Candy; Crankbrothers Eggbeater; Plat / fără plăcuțe; Look Delta; Look Keo; Look X-Track; SPD (2 șuruburi); SPD-SL; SPD-SL (3 șuruburi); Speedplay; Speedplay (4 găuri); Time ATAC; Universal; Wahoo Speedplay; Altele
zh-CN: 适用锁片系统: Crankbrothers; Crankbrothers Candy; Crankbrothers Eggbeater; 平踏/无锁片; Look Delta; Look Keo; Look X-Track; SPD（2 孔）; SPD-SL; SPD-SL（3 孔）; Speedplay; Speedplay（4 孔）; Time ATAC; 通用; Wahoo Speedplay; 其他
sk-SK: Kompatibilný systém vystužovacej lišty: Crankbrothers; Crankbrothers Candy; Crankbrothers Eggbeater; Ploché/bez zarážky; Look Delta; Look Keo; Look X-Track; SPD (2-skrutkový); SPD-SL; SPD-SL (3-skrutkový); Speedplay; Speedplay (4-dierový); Time ATAC; Univerzálny; Wahoo Speedplay; Iné
cs: Kompatibilní systém nášlapů: Crankbrothers; Crankbrothers Candy; Crankbrothers Eggbeater; Ploché / bez zarážek; Look Delta; Look Keo; Look X-Track; SPD (2šroubové); SPD-SL; SPD-SL (3šroubové); Speedplay; Speedplay (4otvorové); Time ATAC; Univerzální; Wahoo Speedplay; Jiné
hu: Kompatibilis stoplirendszer: Crankbrothers; Crankbrothers Candy; Crankbrothers Eggbeater; Lapos / stopli nélkül; Look Delta; Look Keo; Look X-Track; SPD (2 csavaros); SPD-SL; SPD-SL (3 csavaros); Speedplay; Speedplay (4 lyukú); Time ATAC; Univerzális; Wahoo Speedplay; Egyéb
de: Kompatibles Stollensystem: Crankbrothers; Crankbrothers Candy; Crankbrothers Eggbeater; Flach/ohne Cleat; Look Delta; Look Keo; Look X-Track; SPD (2-Loch); SPD-SL; SPD-SL (3-Loch); Speedplay; Speedplay (4-Loch); Time ATAC; Universal; Wahoo Speedplay; Sonstige
pl: Zgodny system korków: Crankbrothers; Crankbrothers Candy; Crankbrothers Eggbeater; Płaskie / bez bloków; Look Delta; Look Keo; Look X-Track; SPD (na 2 śruby); SPD-SL; SPD-SL (na 3 śruby); Speedplay; Speedplay (na 4 otwory); Time ATAC; Uniwersalny; Wahoo Speedplay; Inne
it: Sistema della tacchetta compatibile: Crankbrothers; Crankbrothers Candy; Crankbrothers Eggbeater; Flat / senza tacchette; Look Delta; Look Keo; Look X-Track; SPD (2 bulloni); SPD-SL; SPD-SL (3 bulloni); Speedplay; Speedplay (4 fori); Time ATAC; Universale; Wahoo Speedplay; Altro
es: Sistema de tacos compatible: Crankbrothers; Crankbrothers Candy; Crankbrothers Eggbeater; Plana/sin cala; Look Delta; Look Keo; Look X-Track; SPD (2 tornillos); SPD-SL; SPD-SL (3 tornillos); Speedplay; Speedplay (4 agujeros); Time ATAC; Universal; Wahoo Speedplay; Otro
el: Συμβατό σύστημα καρφιού: Crankbrothers; Crankbrothers Candy; Crankbrothers Eggbeater; Επίπεδο / χωρίς σχαράκι; Look Delta; Look Keo; Look X-Track; SPD (2 βιδών); SPD-SL; SPD-SL (3 βιδών); Speedplay; Speedplay (4 οπών); Time ATAC; Γενικής χρήσης; Wahoo Speedplay; Άλλο
ja: 対応クリートシステム: Crankbrothers; Crankbrothers Candy; Crankbrothers Eggbeater; フラット / クリートなし; Look Delta; Look Keo; Look X-Track; SPD (2つ穴); SPD-SL; SPD-SL (3つ穴); Speedplay; Speedplay (4つ穴); Time ATAC; 汎用; Wahoo Speedplay; その他
nl: Compatibel schoenplaatjessysteem: Crankbrothers; Crankbrothers Candy; Crankbrothers Eggbeater; Plat / geen schoenplaatje; Look Delta; Look Keo; Look X-Track; SPD (2-bouts); SPD-SL; SPD-SL (3-bouts); Speedplay; Speedplay (4-gaats); Time ATAC; Universeel; Wahoo Speedplay; Overig
fr: Système de crampons compatible: Crankbrothers; Crankbrothers Candy; Crankbrothers Eggbeater; Plat / sans cale; Look Delta; Look Keo; Look X-Track; SPD (2 vis); SPD-SL; SPD-SL (3 vis); Speedplay; Speedplay (4 trous); Time ATAC; Universel; Wahoo Speedplay; Autre
fi: Yhteensopiva klossijärjestelmä: Crankbrothers; Crankbrothers Candy; Crankbrothers Eggbeater; Tasainen / ei klossia; Look Delta; Look Keo; Look X-Track; SPD (2-pulttinen); SPD-SL; SPD-SL (3-pulttinen); Speedplay; Speedplay (4-reikäinen); Time ATAC; Universaali; Wahoo Speedplay; Muu
lt-LT: Suderinama spaustukų sistema: Crankbrothers; Crankbrothers Candy; Crankbrothers Eggbeater; Plokšti / be plokštelių; Look Delta; Look Keo; Look X-Track; SPD (2 varžtų); SPD-SL; SPD-SL (3 varžtų); Speedplay; Speedplay (4 skylių); Time ATAC; Universali; Wahoo Speedplay; Kita
th: ระบบยึดรองเท้าที่เข้ากันได้: Crankbrothers; Crankbrothers Candy; Crankbrothers Eggbeater; บันไดเรียบ/ไม่มีคลีต; Look Delta; Look Keo; Look X-Track; SPD (2 โบลต์); SPD-SL; SPD-SL (3 โบลต์); Speedplay; Speedplay (4 รู); Time ATAC; อเนกประสงค์; Wahoo Speedplay; อื่นๆ
vi: Hệ thống cá giày tương thích: Crankbrothers; Crankbrothers Candy; Crankbrothers Eggbeater; Phẳng / không can; Look Delta; Look Keo; Look X-Track; SPD (2 chốt); SPD-SL; SPD-SL (3 chốt); Speedplay; Speedplay (4 lỗ); Time ATAC; Đa năng; Wahoo Speedplay; Khác
tr: Uyumlu kilit sistemi: Crankbrothers; Crankbrothers Candy; Crankbrothers Eggbeater; Düz / kilit yok; Look Delta; Look Keo; Look X-Track; SPD (2 cıvatalı); SPD-SL; SPD-SL (3 cıvatalı); Speedplay; Speedplay (4 delikli); Time ATAC; Evrensel; Wahoo Speedplay; Diğer
ru: Совместимая система шипов: Crankbrothers; Crankbrothers Candy; Crankbrothers Eggbeater; Плоские / без шипов; Look Delta; Look Keo; Look X-Track; SPD (2 винта); SPD-SL; SPD-SL (3 винта); Speedplay; Speedplay (4 отверстия); Time ATAC; Универсальная; Wahoo Speedplay; Другое
sl-SI: Združljiv sistem kolesarskih čevljev: Crankbrothers; Crankbrothers Candy; Crankbrothers Eggbeater; Ravna pedala/brez blokeja; Look Delta; Look Keo; Look X-Track; SPD (2 vijaka); SPD-SL; SPD-SL (3 vijaki); Speedplay; Speedplay (4 luknje); Time ATAC; Univerzalno; Wahoo Speedplay; Drugo
pt-PT: Sistema de travessas compatível: Crankbrothers; Crankbrothers Candy; Crankbrothers Eggbeater; Plano/sem travessa; Look Delta; Look Keo; Look X-Track; SPD (2 parafusos); SPD-SL; SPD-SL (3 parafusos); Speedplay; Speedplay (4 orifícios); Time ATAC; Universal; Wahoo Speedplay; Outro
ko: 호환 클릿 시스템: Crankbrothers; Crankbrothers Candy; Crankbrothers Eggbeater; 플랫/클릿 없음; Look Delta; Look Keo; Look X-Track; SPD(2볼트); SPD-SL; SPD-SL(3볼트); Speedplay; Speedplay(4홀); Time ATAC; 범용; Wahoo Speedplay; 기타
sv: Kompatibelt klossystem: Crankbrothers; Crankbrothers Candy; Crankbrothers Eggbeater; Platt/ingen kloss; Look Delta; Look Keo; Look X-Track; SPD (2-bult); SPD-SL; SPD-SL (3-bult); Speedplay; Speedplay (4-håls); Time ATAC; Universellt; Wahoo Speedplay; Annat
pt-BR: Sistema de trava compatível: Crankbrothers; Crankbrothers Candy; Crankbrothers Eggbeater; Plano / sem taco; Look Delta; Look Keo; Look X-Track; SPD (2 parafusos); SPD-SL; SPD-SL (3 parafusos); Speedplay; Speedplay (4 furos); Time ATAC; Universal; Wahoo Speedplay; Outro
nb: Kompatibelt klossesystem: Crankbrothers; Crankbrothers Candy; Crankbrothers Eggbeater; Flat / ingen kloss; Look Delta; Look Keo; Look X-Track; SPD (2-bolts); SPD-SL; SPD-SL (3-bolts); Speedplay; Speedplay (4-hulls); Time ATAC; Universell; Wahoo Speedplay; Annet